Utah statutes.
59-10-125.   Adjustment after change of accounting method.
(1)  If a taxpayer's method of accounting is changed, other than from an
accrual to an installment method, any additional tax that results from
adjustments determined to be necessary solely by reason of the change may not
be greater than if those adjustments were ratably allocated and included for
the taxable year of the change and the preceding taxable years, not in excess
of two, during which the taxpayer used the method of accounting from which the
change is made.
(2)  If a taxpayer's method of accounting is changed from an accrual to an
installment method, any additional tax for the taxable year of the change in
the method of accounting and for any subsequent taxable year that is
attributable to the receipt of installment payments properly accrued in a
prior taxable year, shall be reduced by the portion of tax for any prior
taxable year attributable to the accrual of such installment payments, under
rules prescribed by the commission in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
